Utah statutes.
63C-8-102.   Medical Education Program.
(1)  There is created a Medical Education Program to be administered by the
Medical Education Council in cooperation with the Division of Finance.
(2)  The program shall be funded from monies received for graduate medical
education from:
(a)  the federal Health Care Financing Administration or other federal agency;
(b)  state appropriations; and
(c)  donation or private contributions.
(3)  All funding for this program shall be nonlapsing.
(4)  Program monies may only be expended if:
(a)  approved by the council; and
(b)  used for graduate medical education in accordance with Subsection
63C-8-104(7).
